Florida, session 2026, HB69.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 193.155, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
193.155 Homestead assessments.—Homestead property shall be
assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving
the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed
at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property
receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8)
apply.
(1) Beginning in 1995, or the year following the year the
property receives homestead exemption, whichever is later, the
property shall be reassessed annually on January 1. Any change
resulting from such reassessment shall not exceed the lower of
the following:
(a) One and one-half Three percent of the assessed value
of the property for the prior year; or
(b) The percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average, all items 1967=100, or
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb69-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 69 2026
successor reports for the preceding calendar year as initially
reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
Labor Statistics.
Section 2. This act shall take effect on the effective
date of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by HJR
67 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same
specified intent and purpose, if such amendment to the State
Constitution is approved at the next general election or at an
earlier special election specifically authorized by law for that
purpose.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb69-00